Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 2. Personal Property.

Sec. 34.05.030.
Obtaining rental equipment with intent to defraud. [Repealed, § 21 ch 166 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 34.05.040.
Failure to return rental equipment.

A person in possession of equipment under an agreement in writing that requires the person to return the equipment to a particular place or at a particular time who refuses or wilfully neglects to return it to the place and at the time specified in the agreement in writing, or who secretes, converts, sells, or attempts to sell the equipment or any part of it is, upon conviction, punishable by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by a fine of not more than $1,000, or by both.

History.

(§ 1 ch 81 SLA 1966)

Collateral references. —

50 Am. Jur. 2d, Larceny, § 86 et seq.

52B C.J.S., Larceny, § 47.

Sec. 34.05.050.
Definitions.

In AS

34.05.040

,

“equipment” means any tools, machinery, implements, or appliances used for any type of purpose or service;

“wilfully neglects” means omits, fails, or forebears, with a conscious purpose to injure, or without regard for the rights of the owner, or with indifference whether a wrong is done the owner or not.

History.

(§ 1 ch 81 SLA 1966)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1985 to alphabetize the defined terms.